New York, session 2025-2026, S931.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 1287 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as added by section 10 of part XX of chapter 58 of the laws of 3 2020, is amended to read as follows: 4 2. Leaving the scene of an incident involving an electric scooter 5 without reporting in the second degree is a [violation] class A misde- 6 meanor. 7 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 1288 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 8 added by section 10 of part XX of chapter 58 of the laws of 2020, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 2. Leaving the scene of an incident involving an electric scooter 11 without reporting in the first degree is a class [B misdemeanor] E felo- 12 ny. 13 § 3. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding two new sections 14 1244 and 1245 to read as follows: 15 § 1244. Leaving the scene of an incident involving a bicycle with 16 electric assist without reporting in the second degree. 1. Any person 17 eighteen years or older operating a bicycle with electric assist who, 18 knowing or having cause to know, that physical injury, as defined in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03218-02-5 S. 931--A 2 1 subdivision nine of section 10.00 of the penal law, has been caused to 2 another person, due to the operation of such bicycle with electric 3 assist by such person, shall, before leaving the place where the said 4 physical injury occurred, stop, and provide their name and residence, 5 including street and street number, to the injured party, then such 6 person shall report said incident as soon as physically able to the 7 nearest police station or judicial officer. 8 2. Leaving the scene of an incident involving a bicycle with electric 9 assist without reporting in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor. 10 § 1245. Leaving the scene of an incident involving a bicycle with 11 electric assist without reporting in the first degree. 1. Any person age 12 eighteen years or older operating a bicycle with electric assist who, 13 knowing or having cause to know, that serious physical injury, as 14 defined in subdivision ten of section 10.00 of the penal law, has been 15 caused to another person, due to the operation of such bicycle with 16 electric assist by such person, shall, before leaving the place where 17 the said serious physical injury occurred, stop, and provide their name 18 and residence, including street and street number, to the injured party, 19 if practical, and also to a police officer, or in the event that no 20 police officer is in the vicinity of the place of said injury, then such 21 person shall report said incident as soon as physically able to the 22 nearest police station or judicial officer. 23 2. Leaving the scene of an incident involving a bicycle with electric 24 assist without reporting in the first degree is a class E felony. 25 § 4. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 27 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 28 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 29 on or before such effective date.